Illinois, session 104th, HB1641.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Identification Card Act is amended 5by changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 335/4)  (from Ch. 124, par. 24)7    Sec. 4. Identification card. 8    (a) In accordance with the requirements of this Section, 9the Secretary of State shall issue a standard Illinois 10Identification Card, as well as a mobile Illinois 11Identification Card, to any natural person who is a resident 12of the State of Illinois who applies for such a card, or 13renewal thereof. No identification card shall be issued to any 14person who holds a valid foreign state identification card, 15license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to the 16Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 17card, license, or permit. The card shall be prepared and 18supplied by the Secretary of State and shall include a 19photograph and signature or mark of the applicant. However, 20the Secretary of State may provide by rule for the issuance of 21Illinois Identification Cards without photographs if the 22applicant has a bona fide religious objection to being 23photographed or to the display of his or her photograph. The   HB1641- 2 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1Illinois Identification Card may be used for identification 2purposes in any lawful situation only by the person to whom it 3was issued. As used in this Act, "photograph" means any color 4photograph or digitally produced and captured image of an 5applicant for an identification card. As used in this Act, 6"signature" means the name of a person as written by that 7person and captured in a manner acceptable to the Secretary of 8State.9    (a-5) If an applicant for an identification card has a 10current driver's license or instruction permit issued by the 11Secretary of State, the Secretary may require the applicant to 12utilize the same residence address and name on the 13identification card, driver's license, and instruction permit 14records maintained by the Secretary. The Secretary may 15promulgate rules to implement this provision. 16    (a-10) If the applicant is a judicial officer as defined 17in Section 1-10 of the Judicial Privacy Act or a peace officer, 18the applicant may elect to have his or her office or work 19address listed on the card instead of the applicant's 20residence or mailing address. The Secretary may promulgate 21rules to implement this provision. For the purposes of this 22subsection (a-10), "peace officer" means any person who by 23virtue of his or her office or public employment is vested by 24law with a duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for 25a violation of any penal statute of this State, whether that 26duty extends to all violations or is limited to specific   HB1641- 3 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1violations. 2    (a-15) The Secretary of State may provide for an expedited 3process for the issuance of an Illinois Identification Card. 4The Secretary shall charge an additional fee for the expedited 5issuance of an Illinois Identification Card, to be set by 6rule, not to exceed $75. All fees collected by the Secretary 7for expedited Illinois Identification Card service shall be 8deposited into the Secretary of State Special Services Fund. 9The Secretary may adopt rules regarding the eligibility, 10process, and fee for an expedited Illinois Identification 11Card. If the Secretary of State determines that the volume of 12expedited identification card requests received on a given day 13exceeds the ability of the Secretary to process those requests 14in an expedited manner, the Secretary may decline to provide 15expedited services, and the additional fee for the expedited 16service shall be refunded to the applicant. 17    (a-20) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 18Illinois Identification Card to a person committed to the 19Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 20a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 21county jail or county department of corrections as follows: if 22the person has a social security number,23        (1) A committed person who has previously held an 24    Illinois Identification Card or an Illinois driver's 25    license shall submit an Identification Card verification 26    form to the Secretary of State, including a photograph   HB1641- 4 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1    taken by the correctional facility, proof of residency 2    upon discharge, and a social security number, if the 3    committed person has a social security number. If the 4    committed person does not have a social security number 5    and is eligible for a social security number, the 6    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 7    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 8    social security number. If the committed person's 9    photograph and demographic information matches an existing 10    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 11    and the Secretary of State verifies the applicant's social 12    security number with the Social Security Administration, 13    the Secretary of State shall issue the committed person a 14    standard Illinois Identification Card. If the photograph 15    or demographic information matches an existing Illinois 16    Identification Card or Illinois driver's license in 17    another person's name or identity, a standard Illinois 18    Identification Card shall not be issued until the 19    committed person submits a certified birth certificate and 20    social security card to the Secretary of State and the 21    Secretary of State verifies the identity of the committed 22    person. If the Secretary of State cannot find a match to an 23    existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's 24    license, the committed person may apply for a standard 25    Illinois Identification card as described in paragraph 26    (2).  HB1641- 5 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1        (2) A committed person who has not previously held an 2    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 3    or for whom a match cannot be found as described in 4    paragraph (1) shall submit an Illinois Identification Card 5    verification form, including a photograph taken by the 6    correctional facility, a certified birth certificate, 7    proof of residency upon discharge, and a social security 8    number, if the committed has a social security number. If 9    the committed person does not have a social security 10    number and is eligible for a social security number, the 11    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 12    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 13    social security number. If the Secretary of State verifies 14    the applicant's social security number with the Social 15    Security Administration, the Secretary of State shall 16    issue the committed person a standard Illinois 17    Identification Card.18    The Illinois Identification Card verification form 19described in this subsection shall be prescribed by the 20Secretary of State. The Secretary of State and correctional 21facilities in this State shall establish a secure method to 22transfer the form.23    (a-25) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 24Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a committed 25person upon release on parole, mandatory supervised release, 26aftercare release, final discharge, or pardon from the   HB1641- 6 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 2a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 3county jail or county department of corrections, if the 4released person does not obtain a standard Illinois 5Identification Card as described in subsection (a-20) prior to 6release but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 7Identification Card verification form completed by the 8correctional facility, verifying the released person's date of 9birth, social security number, if the person has a social 10security number, and his or her Illinois residence address. 11The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 12days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 13Identification Card.14    Prior to the expiration of the 90-day period of the 15limited-term Illinois Identification Card, if the released 16person submits to the Secretary of State a certified copy of 17his or her birth certificate and his or her social security 18card, if the person has a social security number, or other 19documents authorized by the Secretary, a standard Illinois 20Identification Card shall be issued. A limited-term Illinois 21Identification Card may not be renewed. 22    This subsection shall not apply to a released person who 23was unable to obtain a standard Illinois Identification Card 24because his or her photograph or demographic information 25matched an existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 26driver's license in another person's name or identity or to a   HB1641- 7 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1released person who does not have a social security number and 2is eligible for a social security number.3    (a-30) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 4Illinois Identification Card to a person upon conditional 5release or absolute discharge from the custody of the 6Department of Human Services, if the person presents a 7certified copy of his or her birth certificate, social 8security card, if the person has a social security number, or 9other documents authorized by the Secretary, and a document 10proving his or her Illinois residence address. The Secretary 11of State shall issue a standard Illinois Identification Card 12to a person prior to his or her conditional release or absolute 13discharge if personnel from the Department of Human Services 14bring the person to a Secretary of State location with the 15required documents. Documents proving residence address may 16include any official document of the Department of Human 17Services showing the person's address after release and a 18Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which may be 19executed by personnel of the Department of Human Services.20    (a-35) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 21Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a person 22upon conditional release or absolute discharge from the 23custody of the Department of Human Services, if the person is 24unable to present a certified copy of his or her birth 25certificate and social security card, if the person has a 26social security number, or other documents authorized by the   HB1641- 8 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1Secretary, but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 2verification form completed by the Department of Human 3Services, verifying the person's date of birth and social 4security number, if the person has a social security number, 5and a document proving his or her Illinois residence address. 6The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 7days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 8Identification Card. The Secretary of State shall issue a 9limited-term Illinois Identification Card to a person no 10sooner than 14 days prior to his or her conditional release or 11absolute discharge if personnel from the Department of Human 12Services bring the person to a Secretary of State location 13with the required documents. Documents proving residence 14address shall include any official document of the Department 15of Human Services showing the person's address after release 16and a Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which 17may be executed by personnel of the Department of Human 18Services. 19    (b) The Secretary of State shall issue a special Illinois 20Identification Card, which shall be known as an Illinois 21Person with a Disability Identification Card, to any natural 22person who is a resident of the State of Illinois, who is a 23person with a disability as defined in Section 4A of this Act, 24who applies for such card, or renewal thereof. No Illinois 25Person with a Disability Identification Card shall be issued 26to any person who holds a valid foreign state identification   HB1641- 9 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1card, license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to 2the Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 3card, license, or permit. The Secretary of State shall charge 4no fee to issue such card. The card shall be prepared and 5supplied by the Secretary of State, and shall include a 6photograph and signature or mark of the applicant, a 7designation indicating that the card is an Illinois Person 8with a Disability Identification Card, and shall include a 9comprehensible designation of the type and classification of 10the applicant's disability as set out in Section 4A of this 11Act. However, the Secretary of State shall may provide by rule 12for the issuance of Illinois Person with a Disability 13Identification Cards without photographs if the applicant has 14a bona fide religious objection to being photographed or to 15the display of his or her photograph. If the applicant so 16requests, the card shall include a description of the 17applicant's disability and any information about the 18applicant's disability or medical history which the Secretary 19determines would be helpful to the applicant in securing 20emergency medical care. If a mark is used in lieu of a 21signature, such mark shall be affixed to the card in the 22presence of 2 two witnesses who attest to the authenticity of 23the mark. The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification 24Card may be used for identification purposes in any lawful 25situation by the person to whom it was issued.26    The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card   HB1641- 10 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1may be used as adequate documentation of disability in lieu of 2a physician's determination of disability, a determination of 3disability from a physician assistant, a determination of 4disability from an advanced practice registered nurse, or any 5other documentation of disability whenever any State law 6requires that a person with a disability provide such 7documentation of disability, however an Illinois Person with a 8Disability Identification Card shall not qualify the 9cardholder to participate in any program or to receive any 10benefit which is not available to all persons with like 11disabilities. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, an 12Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card, or 13evidence that the Secretary of State has issued an Illinois 14Person with a Disability Identification Card, shall not be 15used by any person other than the person named on such card to 16prove that the person named on such card is a person with a 17disability or for any other purpose unless the card is used for 18the benefit of the person named on such card, and the person 19named on such card consents to such use at the time the card is 20so used.21    An optometrist's determination of a visual disability 22under Section 4A of this Act is acceptable as documentation 23for the purpose of issuing an Illinois Person with a 24Disability Identification Card. 25    When medical information is contained on an Illinois 26Person with a Disability Identification Card, the Office of   HB1641- 11 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1the Secretary of State shall not be liable for any actions 2taken based upon that medical information.3    (c) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 4original or renewal Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 5Person with a Disability Identification Card issued to a 6person under the age of 21 shall be of a distinct nature from 7those Illinois Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a 8Disability Identification Cards issued to individuals 21 years 9of age or older. The color designated for Illinois 10Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a Disability 11Identification Cards for persons under the age of 21 shall be 12at the discretion of the Secretary of State.13    (c-1) Each original or renewal Illinois Identification 14Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 15issued to a person under the age of 21 shall display the date 16upon which the person becomes 18 years of age and the date upon 17which the person becomes 21 years of age.18    (c-3) The General Assembly recognizes the need to identify 19military veterans living in this State for the purpose of 20ensuring that they receive all of the services and benefits to 21which they are legally entitled, including healthcare, 22education assistance, and job placement. To assist the State 23in identifying these veterans and delivering these vital 24services and benefits, the Secretary of State is authorized to 25issue Illinois Identification Cards and Illinois Person with a 26Disability Identification Cards with the word "veteran"   HB1641- 12 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1appearing on the face of the cards. This authorization is 2predicated on the unique status of veterans. The Secretary may 3not issue any other identification card which identifies an 4occupation, status, affiliation, hobby, or other unique 5characteristics of the identification card holder which is 6unrelated to the purpose of the identification card.7    (c-5) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, the Secretary 8of State shall designate a space on each original or renewal 9identification card where, at the request of the applicant, 10the word "veteran" shall be placed. The veteran designation 11shall be available to a person identified as a veteran under 12subsection (b) of Section 5 of this Act who was discharged or 13separated under honorable conditions. 14    (d) The Secretary of State may issue a Senior Citizen 15discount card, to any natural person who is a resident of the 16State of Illinois who is 60 years of age or older and who 17applies for such a card or renewal thereof. The Secretary of 18State shall charge no fee to issue such card. The card shall be 19issued in every county and applications shall be made 20available at, but not limited to, nutrition sites, senior 21citizen centers and Area Agencies on Aging. The applicant, 22upon receipt of such card and prior to its use for any purpose, 23shall have affixed thereon in the space provided therefor his 24signature or mark.25    (e) The Secretary of State, in his or her discretion, may 26designate on each Illinois Identification Card or Illinois   HB1641- 13 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1Person with a Disability Identification Card a space where the 2card holder may place a sticker or decal, issued by the 3Secretary of State, of uniform size as the Secretary may 4specify, that shall indicate in appropriate language that the 5card holder has renewed his or her Illinois Identification 6Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card.7    (f)(1) The Secretary of State may issue a mobile 8identification card to an individual who is otherwise eligible 9to hold a physical credential in addition to, and not instead 10of, an identification card if the Secretary of State has 11issued an identification card to the person. The data elements 12that are used to build an electronic credential must match the 13individual's current Department record.14    (2) The Secretary may enter into agreements or contract 15with an agency of the State, another state, the United States, 16or a third party to facilitate the issuance, use, and 17verification of a mobile identification card issued by the 18Secretary or another state.19    (3) Any mobile identification card issued by the Secretary 20shall be in accordance with the most recent AAMVA standards.21    (4) The Secretary shall design the mobile identification 22card in a manner that allows the credential holder to maintain 23physical possession of the device on which the mobile 24identification card is accessed during verification.25    (g) The verification process shall be implemented to 26require:  HB1641- 14 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1        (1) the relying parties to authenticate electronic 2    credentials in accordance with applicable AAMVA standards 3    prior to acceptance of the electronic credential;4        (2) the Secretary to ensure that electronic credential 5    data is subject to all jurisdictional data security and 6    privacy protection laws and regulations; and7        (3) the relying parties to request only electronic 8    credential data elements that are necessary to complete 9    the transaction for which data is being requested.10    (h) Privacy and tracking of data shall be restricted by 11implementing the following requirements:12        (1) the relying parties shall retain only electronic 13    credential data elements for which the relying party 14    explicitly obtained consent from the electronic credential 15    holder and shall inform the electronic credential holder 16    of the use and retention period of the electronic data 17    elements;18        (2) the Secretary shall use an electronic credential 19    system that is designed to maximize the privacy of the 20    credential holder in accordance with State and federal law 21    and shall not track or compile information without the 22    credential holder's consent; and23        (3) the Department shall only compile and disclose 24    information regarding the use of the credential as 25    required by State or federal law.26    (i)(1) The electronic credential holder shall be required   HB1641- 15 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1to have the holder's their physical credential on the holder's 2their person for all purposes for which an identification card 3is required. No person, public entity, private entity, or 4agency shall establish a policy that requires an electronic 5credential instead of a physical credential.6    (2) Electronic credential systems shall be designed so 7that there is no requirement for the electronic credential 8holder to display or relinquish possession of the credential 9holder's mobile device to relying parties for the acceptance 10of an electronic credential.11    (3) When required by law and upon request by law 12enforcement, a credential holder must provide the credential 13holder's physical credential.14    (4) Any law or regulation that requires an individual to 15surrender the individual's their physical credential to law 16enforcement does not apply to the device on which an 17electronic credential has been provisioned.18    (j) A person may be required to produce when so requested a 19physical identification card to a law enforcement officer, a 20representative of a State or federal department or agency, or 21a private entity and is subject to all applicable laws and 22consequences for failure to produce such an identification 23card.24    (k) The Secretary of State shall adopt such rules as are 25necessary to implement a mobile identification card.26    (l) The display of a mobile identification card shall not   HB1641- 16 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1serve as consent or authorization for a law enforcement 2officer, or any other person, to search, view, or access any 3other data or application on the mobile device. If a person 4presents the person's mobile device to a law enforcement 5officer for purposes of displaying a mobile identification 6card, the law enforcement officer shall promptly return the 7mobile device to the person once the officer has had an 8opportunity to verify the identity of the person. Except for 9willful and wanton misconduct, any law enforcement officer, 10court, or officer of the court presented with the device shall 11be immune from any liability resulting from damage to the 12mobile device.13    (m) The fee to install the application to display a mobile 14identification card as defined in this subsection shall not 15exceed $6.16    (n) As used in this Section:17    "AAMVA" means the American Association of Motor Vehicle 18Administrators.19    "Credential" means a driver's license, learner's permit, 20or identification card.21    "Credential holder" means the individual to whom a mobile 22driver's license or a mobile identification card is issued.23    "Data element" means a distinct component of a customer's 24information that is found on the Department's customer record.25    "Department" means the Secretary of State Department of 26Driver Services.  HB1641- 17 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1    "Electronic credential" means an electronic extension of 2the departmental issued physical credential that conveys 3identity and complies with AAMVA's mobile driver license 4Implementation guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard.5    "Electronic credential system" means a digital process 6that includes a method for provisioning electronic 7credentials, requesting and transmitting electronic credential 8data elements, and performing tasks to maintain the system.9    "Full profile" means all the information provided on an 10identification card.11    "ISO" means the International Organization for 12Standardization, which creates uniform processes and 13procedures. 14    "Limited profile" means a portion of the information 15provided on an Identification Card.16    "Mobile identification card" means a data file that is 17available on any mobile device that has connectivity to the 18Internet through an application that allows the mobile device 19to download the data file from the Secretary of State, that 20contains all the data elements visible on the face and back of 21an identification card, and that displays the current status 22of the identification card. "Mobile identification card" does 23not include a copy, photograph, or image of an Illinois 24Identification Card that is not downloaded through the 25application on a mobile device.26    "Physical credential" means a Department-issued Department   HB1641- 18 -LRB104 08328 SPS 18379 b1issued document that conveys identity in accordance with the 2Illinois Identification Card Act.3    "Provision" means the initial loading of an electronic 4credential onto a device.5    "Relying party" means the entity to which the credential 6holder presents the electronic credential.7    "Verification process" means a method of authenticating 8the electronic credential through the use of secured 9encryption communication. 10    (o) (f) Upon providing the required documentation, at the 11request of the applicant, the identification card may reflect 12Gold Star Family designation. The Secretary shall designate a 13space on each original or renewal of an identification card 14for such designation. This designation shall be available to a 15person eligible for Gold Star license plates under subsection 16(f) of Section 6-106 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 17(Source: P.A. 102-299, eff. 8-6-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 18103-345, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-782, eff. 198-6-24; 103-824, eff. 1-1-25; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; revised 2011-26-24.)